Washington statutes.
RCW 27.12.380

Annexation of city or town into library district—Withdrawal of annexed city or town.

The legislative body of such a city or town which has annexed to such a library district, may, by resolution, present to the voters of such city or town a proposition to withdraw from said library district at any general election held at least three years following the annexation to the library district.

[ 1982 c 123 s 15; 1977 ex.s. c 353 s 3.]